Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW

Sec.

72-1316.1. Contributions payable by state. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1301. Short title.

This act shall be known as the “Employment Security Law.”

§ 72-1302. Declaration of state public policy.

The public policy of this state is as follows: Economic insecurity due to unemployment is a serious threat to the well-being of our people. Unemployment is a subject of national and state concern. This chapter addresses this problem by encouraging employers to offer stable employment and by systematically accumulating funds during periods of employment to pay benefits for periods of unemployment. The legislature declares that the general welfare of our citizens requires the enactment of this measure and sets aside unemployment reserves to be used for workers who are unemployed through no fault of their own.

§ 72-1303. Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, these terms shall have the following meanings when used in this chapter.

§ 72-1304. Agricultural labor.

“Agricultural labor” means all services performed:

On a farm, in the employ of any person in connection with cultivating the soil, or raising or harvesting any agricultural, aquacultural or horticultural commodities, including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, fish, poultry, and fur-bearing animals and wildlife;

In the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a farm in connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment, or in salvaging timber or clearing land of brush and other debris left by a hurricane if the major part of such service is performed on a farm;

In connection with the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals, reservoirs, or waterways not owned or operated for profit and used exclusively for supplying and storing water, at least ninety percent (90%) of which was ultimately delivered for agricultural purposes during the preceding calendar year; and

In the employ of any farm operator or group of operators, organized or unorganized, in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, eviscerating, processing, freezing, grading, storing, or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for transportation to market in its unmanufactured state any agricultural, aquacultural or horticultural commodities, if such operator or group, in both the current and preceding calendar years produced more than one-half (1/2) of the commodities with respect to which such service is performed.

“Farm” includes stock, dairy, fish, poultry, fruit, fur-bearing animal and truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, hatcheries, ranges, greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural, aquacultural or horticultural commodities, and orchards.

“Unmanufactured state” means retention of its original form and substance.

“Terminal market” means a place of business to which products are shipped in a sorted, graded, packaged condition, ready for immediate sale.

This subsection is not applicable to services performed in commercial canning, freezing, or dehydrating, or in connection with any agricultural, aquacultural or horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for distribution for consumption.

§ 72-1305. Annual payroll.

“Annual payroll” means total payroll for a period of twelve (12) consecutive calendar months ending on June 30 of any year.

§ 72-1306. Base period.

“Base period” means the first four (4) of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the beginning of a benefit year. If a claimant has insufficient wages in the base period to establish eligibility for unemployment benefits, the “base period” shall be the last four (4) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the beginning of a benefit year.

“Alternate base period” means the first four (4) of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately prior to the Sunday of the week in which a medically verifiable temporary total disability occurred. If a claimant has insufficient wages in the base period to establish eligibility for unemployment benefits, the “alternate base period” shall be the last four (4) completed calendar quarters immediately prior to the Sunday of the week in which a medically verifiable temporary total disability occurred. To use the alternate base period, a claimant must file within three (3) years of the beginning of the temporary total disability, and no longer than six (6) months after the end of the temporary total disability.

§ 72-1307. Benefits.

“Benefits” means the money paid to an individual with respect to his unemployment.

§ 72-1308. Benefit year.

“Benefit year” means a period of fifty-two (52) consecutive weeks beginning with the first day of the week in which an individual files a new valid claim for benefits; except that the benefit year shall be fifty-three (53) weeks if the filing of a new valid claim would result in overlapping any quarter of the base year of a previously filed new claim. A subsequent benefit year cannot be established until the expiration of the current benefit year.

§ 72-1309. Commission.

“Commission” means the industrial commission.

§ 72-1310. Bonus payment.

“Bonus payment” means wages paid for employment by an employer which are either:

Additional remuneration for meritorious service and not customarily paid to his employees at regular payroll intervals; or

Additional remuneration based upon production, length of service, or profits, which at the time paid covers service rendered in two (2) or more calendar quarters. Bonus payments shall be reported by employers as prescribed by rule.

§ 72-1311. Calendar quarter.

“Calendar quarter” means the period of three (3) consecutive calendar months ending on March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31, in each year.

§ 72-1312. Compensable week.

“Compensable week” means a week of unemployment, all of which occurred within the benefit year, for which an eligible claimant is entitled to benefits and during which:

The claimant had either no work or less than full-time work; and

No benefits have been paid to the claimant; and

The claimant complied with all of the personal eligibility conditions of section 72-1366, Idaho Code; and

The total wages payable to the claimant for less than full-time work performed in such week amounted to less than one and one-half (1 1/2) times his weekly benefit amount; provided however, that any benefits which a claimant receives for any week shall be reduced by:

An amount equal to the amount received as pension, retirement pay, annuity, or any other similar payment which is based on the previous work of such individual which is reasonably attributable to such week, if the payment is made under a plan maintained or contributed to by the base period employer and the claimant has made no contributions to the plan;

An amount equal to temporary disability benefits received under a worker’s compensation law of any state or under a similar law of the United States; and

All of which occurred after a waiting week as defined in section 72-1329, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1312A. Corporate officer — Employment.

A corporate officer meeting the requirements of section 72-1312, Idaho Code, whose claim for benefits is based on any wages with a corporation in which the corporate officer or a family member of the corporate officer has an ownership interest shall be:

Not “unemployed” and ineligible for benefits in any week during the corporate officer’s term of office with the corporation, even if wages are not being paid.

“Unemployed” in any week the corporate officer is not employed by the corporation for a period of indefinite duration because of circumstances beyond the control of the corporate officer or a family member of the corporate officer with an ownership interest in the corporation, and the period of “unemployment” extends at least through the corporate officer’s benefit year end date. If at any time during the benefit year the corporate officer resumes or returns to work for the corporation, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the corporate officer’s unemployment was due to circumstances within the corporate officer’s control or the control of a family member with an ownership interest in the corporation, and all benefits paid to the corporate officer during the benefit year shall be considered an overpayment for which the corporate officer shall be liable for repayment.

For purposes of this section, “family member” is a person related by blood or marriage as parent, stepparent, grandparent, spouse, brother, sister, child, stepchild, adopted child or grandchild.

§ 72-1313. Computation date.

“Computation date” means the June 30 immediately prior to the calendar year for which a covered employer’s taxable wage rate is effective.

§ 72-1314. Contributions.

“Contributions” means the payments required to be paid into the employment security fund by any covered employer pursuant to sections 72-1349 through 72-1353, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1315. Covered employer.

“Covered employer” means:

Any person who, in any calendar quarter in either the current or preceding calendar year paid for services in covered employment wages of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or more, or for some portion of a day in each of twenty (20) different calendar weeks, whether or not consecutive, in either the current or preceding calendar year employed at least one (1) individual, irrespective of whether the same individual was in employment in each such day. For purposes of this subsection there shall not be taken into account any wages paid to, or in employment of, an employee performing domestic services referred to in subsection (8) of this section.

All individuals performing services within this state for an employer who maintains two (2) or more separate establishments within this state shall be deemed to be performing services for a single employer.

Each individual engaged to perform or assist in performing the work of any person in the service of an employer shall be deemed to be employed by such employer for all the purposes of this chapter, whether such individual was engaged or paid directly by such employer or by such person, provided the employer had actual or constructive knowledge of the work.

Any employer, whether or not an employer at the time of acquisition, who acquires the organization, trade, or business or substantially all the assets thereof, of another who at the time of such acquisition was a covered employer.

In the case of agricultural labor, any person who:

During any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year paid wages in cash of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more for agricultural labor; or

On each of some twenty (20) days during the calendar year or during the preceding calendar year, each day being in a different calendar week, employed at least ten (10) individuals in employment in agricultural labor for some portion of the day.

Such labor is not agricultural labor when it is performed by an individual who is an alien admitted to the United States to perform agricultural labor pursuant to sections 214(c) and 101(a)(15)(H) of the immigration and nationality act, unless the individual is required to be covered by the federal unemployment tax act.

A licensed farm labor contractor, as provided in chapter 16, title 44, Idaho Code, who furnishes any individual to perform agricultural labor for another person.

An unlicensed, nonexempt farm labor contractor, as provided in chapter 16, title 44, Idaho Code, who furnishes any individual to perform agricultural labor for another person not treated as a covered employer under subsection (5) of this section. If an unlicensed, nonexempt farm labor contractor furnishes any individual to perform agricultural labor for another person who is treated as a covered employer under subsection (5) of this section, both such other person and the unlicensed, nonexempt farm labor contractor shall be jointly and severally liable for any moneys due under the provisions of this chapter.

In the case of domestic service in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority, any person who during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year paid wages in cash of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more for such service.

A person treated as a covered employer under this subsection (8) shall not be treated as a covered employer with respect to wages paid for any service other than domestic service referred to in this subsection (8) unless such person is treated as a covered employer under subsection (1) or (5) of this section, with respect to such other service.
(9) Any governmental entity as defined in section 72-1322C, Idaho Code.

(10) A nonprofit organization as defined in section 72-1322D, Idaho Code.

(11) An employer who has elected coverage pursuant to the provisions of subsection (3) of section 72-1352, Idaho Code.

Section 2 of S.L. 1980, ch. 52 read: “An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its passage and approval and retroactively to January 1, 1980.”
CASE NOTES

§ 72-1315A. Cost reimbursement employer.

“Cost reimbursement employer” means a covered employer who is eligible and elects to reimburse the fund for proportionate benefit costs in lieu of contributions as provided in sections 72-1349A and 72-1349B, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1316. Covered employment.

“Covered employment” means an individual’s entire service performed by him for wages or under any contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied, for a covered employer or covered employers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, services shall be deemed to be in covered employment if a tax is required to be paid or was required to be paid the previous year on such services under the federal unemployment tax act or if the director determines that as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the federal unemployment tax act such services are required to be covered under this chapter.

Services covered by an election pursuant to section 72-1352, Idaho Code, and services covered by an election approved by the director pursuant to section 72-1344, Idaho Code, shall be deemed to be covered employment during the effective period of such election.

Services performed by an individual for remuneration shall, for the purposes of the employment security law, be covered employment unless it is shown:

That the worker has been and will continue to be free from control or direction in the performance of his work, both under his contract of service and in fact; and

That the worker is engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession, or business.

“Covered employment” shall include an individual’s entire service, performed within or both within and without this state:

If the service is localized in this state; or

If the service is not localized in any state but some of the service is performed in this state, and:

The individual’s base of operations or the place from which such service is directed or controlled is in this state; or

The individual’s base of operations or place from which such service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this state.

Service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if:

The service is performed entirely within such state; or

The service is performed both within and without such state, but the service performed without such state is incidental, temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions, as compared to the individual’s service within the state.

“Covered employment” shall include an individual’s service, wherever performed within the United States, or Canada, if:

Such service is not covered under the unemployment compensation law of any other state, the Virgin Islands, or Canada; and

The place from which the service is directed or controlled is in this state.

“Covered employment” shall include the services of an individual who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States, except in Canada, in the employ of an American employer, other than service which is deemed “covered employment” under the provisions of subsection (5) of this section or the parallel provisions of another state’s law, if:

The employer’s principal place of business in the United States is located in this state; or
(b) The employer has no place of business in the United States; but

Is an individual who is a resident of this state; or

Is a corporation which is organized under the laws of this state; or

Is a partnership or a trust and the number of the partners or trustees who are residents of this state is greater than the number who are residents of any other state; or

An individual who is a resident of the United States; or

A partnership if two-thirds (2/3) or more of the partners are residents of the United States; or

A trust if all of the trustees are residents of the United States; or

A corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.

(c) None of the criteria of provision (a) or (b) of this subsection is met but the employer has elected coverage in this state, or the employer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has filed a claim for benefits based on such service, under the law of this state;

(d) An “American employer” for purposes of this subparagraph means a person who is:

(e) For purposes of this subsection, “United States” means the states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.

Section 2 of S.L. 1991, ch. 67 declared an emergency. Approved March 21, 1991.
CASE NOTES

§ 72-1316.1. Contributions payable by state. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1316A. Exempt employment.

“Exempt employment” means service performed:

By an individual in the employ of his spouse or child.

By a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years in the employ of his father or mother.

By an individual under the age of twenty-two (22) years who is enrolled as a student in a full-time program at an accredited nonprofit or public education institution for which credit at such institution is earned in a program which combines academic instruction with work experience. This subsection shall not apply to service performed in a program established at the request of an employer or group of employers.

In the employ of the United States government or an instrumentality of the United States exempt under the constitution of the United States from the contributions imposed by this chapter.

In the employ of a governmental entity in the exercise of duties:

As an elected official;

As a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary, of a state or political subdivision thereof;

As a member of the state national guard or air national guard;

As an employee serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency;

In a position which, pursuant to the laws of this state, is designated as (i) a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position, or (ii) a policymaking or advisory position which ordinarily does not require more than eight (8) hours per week; or

As an election official or election worker including, but not limited to, a poll worker, an election judge, an election clerk or any other member of an election board, if the amount of remuneration received by the individual during the calendar year for services as an election official or election worker is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

By an inmate of a correctional, custodial or penal institution, if such services are performed for or within such institution.

In the employ of:

A church or convention or association of churches; or

An organization which is operated primarily for religious purposes and which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a church, or convention or association of churches; or

In the employ of an institution of higher education, if it is devoted primarily to preparation of a student for the ministry or training candidates to become members of a religious order; or

By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of his ministry or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by such order.

By a program participant in a facility that provides rehabilitation for individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age, physical or mental limitation, or injury or provides remunerative work for individuals who, because of their impaired physical or mental capacity, cannot be readily absorbed into the labor market.

As part of an unemployment work relief program or as part of an unemployment work training program assisted or financed in whole or in part by any federal agency or an agency of a state or political subdivision thereof, by an individual receiving such work relief or work training.

Service with respect to which unemployment insurance is payable under an unemployment insurance system established by an act of congress other than the social security act.

As a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or nurses’ training school by an individual who is enrolled and is regularly attending courses in a nurses’ training school approved pursuant to state law, and service performed as an intern in the employ of a hospital by an individual who has completed a course in a medical school approved pursuant to state law.

By an individual under the age of eighteen (18) years in the delivery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news not including delivery or distribution to any point for subsequent delivery or distribution.

By an individual for a person as an insurance agent or as an insurance solicitor, if all such service performed by such individual for such person is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission.

By an individual for a real estate broker as an associate real estate broker or as a real estate salesman, if all such service performed by such individual for such person is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission.

Service covered by an election approved by the agency charged with the administration of any other state or federal unemployment insurance law, in accordance with an arrangement pursuant to section 72-1344, Idaho Code.

In the employ of a school or college by a student who is enrolled and regularly attending classes at such school or college.

In the employ of a hospital by a resident patient of such hospital.

By a member of an AmeriCorps program.

By an individual who is paid less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per calendar quarter for performing work that is not in the course of the employer’s trade or business, and who is not regularly employed by such employer to perform such service. For the purposes of this subsection, an individual shall be deemed to be regularly employed by an employer during a calendar quarter only if:

On each of some twenty-four (24) days during such quarter such individual performs for such employer for some portion of the day service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business; or

Such individual was so employed by such employer in the performance of such service during the preceding calendar quarter.

By an individual who is engaged in the trade or business of selling or soliciting the sale of consumer products in a private home or a location other than in a permanent retail establishment, provided the following criteria are met:

Substantially all the remuneration, whether or not received in cash, for the performance of the services is directly related to sales or other output, including the performance of services, rather than to the number of hours worked; and

The services performed by the individual are performed pursuant to a written contract between the individual and the person for whom the services are performed, and the contract provides that the individual shall not be treated as an employee for federal and state tax purposes.
Such exemption applies solely to the individual’s engagement in the trade or business of selling or soliciting the sale of consumer products in a private home or location other than in a permanent retail establishment.

By a person who operates a motor vehicle that: (a) such person owns or holds pursuant to a bona fide lease; and (b) is leased to a motor carrier as defined in 49 U.S.C. section 13102, pursuant to a written contract, and in no event will the motor carrier be determined to be the covered employer of such person or the covered employer of an employee of such person.

§ 72-1316B. Termination of coverage of certain governmental entities. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1317. Cut-off date.

September 30 immediately following the computation date is designated as the cut-off date for experience rating purposes.

§ 72-1318. Director — Department.

“Director” means the director of the department of labor, the individual appointed pursuant to section 59-904, Idaho Code.

“Department” means the department of labor.

§ 72-1318A. Decision.

“Decision” means any written ruling made by the department’s appeals bureau pursuant to section 72-1368(6), Idaho Code, or the commission pursuant to section 72-1368(7), Idaho Code.

§ 72-1318B. Determination, revised determination, redetermination or special redetermination.

Except for determinations made pursuant to section 72-1349A(3), Idaho Code, and section 72-1382, Idaho Code, “determination,” “revised determination,” “redetermination” or “special redetermination” are written rulings by the department that include notice of appeal rights.

§ 72-1319. Eligible employer.

“Eligible employer” means a covered employer who has completed a qualifying period as defined in subsection (2) of this section, and who has filed all payroll reports required, has paid, on or before the cut-off date, all contributions and penalties due and has established a record of accumulated contributions in excess of benefits charged to his account. For the purposes of this section, delinquencies of a minor nature may be disregarded if the director is satisfied that such covered employer has acted in good faith and that forfeiture of a reduced taxable wage rate because of such minor delinquency would be inequitable.

“Qualifying period” shall be the period of three (3) consecutive years ending on the computation date in which, during all of said years, the employer shall be chargeable for benefits under this state law, except, that a new employer shall have a qualifying period of one (1) year ending on the computation date in which, during all of said year, the employer shall be chargeable for benefits under this state law.

§ 72-1319A. Deficit employer.

“Deficit employer” means a covered employer who has established a record of accumulated benefits charged to his account in excess of his accumulated contributions paid as of the cut-off date.

§ 72-1319B. Taxable wage rate.

“Taxable wage rate” means the numerical values calculated in accordance with section 72-1350, Idaho Code, for the purpose of establishing contribution rates, training tax rates and reserve tax rates for covered employers.

§ 72-1320. Crew leader.

“Crew leader” means an individual who:

Furnishes individuals to perform agricultural labor for any other person;

Pays (either on his behalf or on behalf of such other person) the individuals so furnished by him for the agricultural labor performed by them; and

Has not entered into a written agreement with such other person under which such individual is designated as an employee of such other person.

§ 72-1321. Determining suitability of its employees, applicants and prospective contractors for employment and access to federal tax information.

The Idaho department of labor may request a criminal record check of state and national databases by submitting the required fees and a set of fingerprints obtained from an employee, a prospective contractor, subcontractor or applicant for employment who will have access to federal tax information, as defined in internal revenue service publication 1075 (2016), to the Idaho state police, bureau of criminal identification. The submission of the required fees, fingerprints and information required by this section shall be on forms prescribed by the Idaho state police.

The department’s human resource director is authorized to receive criminal history information from the Idaho state police and from the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of evaluating the fitness of employees and applicants for contracting or employment, with the Idaho department of labor and for access to federal tax information.

As required by state and federal law, further dissemination or other use of the criminal history information is prohibited. Criminal background reports received from the Idaho state police and the federal bureau of investigation shall be handled and disposed of in a manner consistent with requirements imposed by the Idaho state police and the federal bureau of investigation.

The department shall review the information received from the applicant’s criminal history and background check and:

Determine whether the employee, applicant or contractor has a criminal or other relevant record that would disqualify the individual from having access to federal tax information;

Determine which crimes disqualify the employee, applicant or contractor from having access to federal tax information;

Communicate clearance or denial to the employee, applicant or contractor; and

Provide the employee, applicant or contractor with an opportunity for a formal review of a denial.

The department is immune from liability for an employment decision when it acts in reasonable reliance on the results of the criminal history and background check in making contracting and employment decisions.

Clearance through the criminal history and background check process is not a determination of suitability for employment or contracting.

§ 72-1322. Experience rating.

“Experience rating” means a method of determining variable taxable wage rates allowed to covered employers.

§ 72-1322A. Hospital.

“Hospital” means any institution which has been licensed by, certified, or approved by the state board of health and welfare as a hospital.

§ 72-1322B. Educational institution.

“Educational institution” means:

An institution of higher education which:

Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate; and

Is authorized to provide a program of education beyond high school; and

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor’s or higher degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation.

A primary or secondary school which provides education from preschool and kindergarten through grade twelve (12).

§ 72-1322C. Governmental entity.

“Governmental entity” means this state or any of its instrumentalities, political subdivisions, or districts of whatever type or nature including, but not limited to, school districts, cities, counties, taxing districts, or other entities, as well as any instrumentality of one (1) or more of the foregoing or that is jointly owned by this state or a political subdivision thereof and one (1) or more other states or political subdivisions of this or other states, if service for any such governmental entity is excluded from “employment” as defined in the federal unemployment tax act, 26 U.S.C. 3306(c)(7).

§ 72-1322D. Nonprofit organization.

“Nonprofit organization” means a religious, charitable, educational, or other organization which is described in section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code and which is exempt from tax under section 501(a) of such code.

§ 72-1323. Interested parties.

“Interested party” with respect to a claim for benefits means the claimant, the claimant’s last regular employer, the employer whose account is chargeable for experience rating purposes, the cost reimbursement employer who may be billed for any portion of benefits claimed, and the director or an authorized representative of any of them; “interested party” with respect to proceedings involving employer liability means the employer and the director or an authorized representative.

§ 72-1324. Payroll.

“Payroll” means the amount of wages, as defined in section 72-1328, Idaho Code, paid by a covered employer for covered employment.

§ 72-1325. Person.

“Person” means any individual and any other entity recognized by Idaho law, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee, or successor of any of the foregoing, or the legal representative of a deceased person.

§ 72-1326. Quarterly payroll. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1327. State.

“State” includes, in addition to the states of the United States of America, the District of Columbia, the Dominion of Canada, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.

§ 72-1327A. Valid claim.

“Valid claim” means any application for benefits which is found to be eligible as provided in section 72-1367, Idaho Code, and which has been filed in accordance with this chapter and such rules as the director may prescribe.

§ 72-1328. Wages.

“Wages” shall include:

All remuneration for personal services from whatever source, including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all remuneration in any medium other than cash;

All tips received while performing services in covered employment totaling twenty dollars ($20.00) or more in a month, which are reported in writing to the employer as required under federal law;

Any employer contribution under a qualified cash or deferred agreement as defined in 26 U.S.C. 401(k) to the extent such contribution is not included in gross income by reason of 26 U.S.C. 402(a)(8).

The term “wages” shall not include:

Payments (including any amount paid by an employer for insurance or annuities, or into a fund, to provide for any such payment), made to, or on behalf of, an individual or any of his dependents under a plan established by an employer which makes provision generally for individuals performing service for him (or for such individuals generally and their dependents) or for a class or classes of such individuals (or for a class or classes of such individuals and their dependents), on account of (i) sickness or accident disability (but, in the case of payments made to an employee or any of his dependents, this subparagraph shall exclude from the term “wages” only payments which are received under a worker’s compensation law), or (ii) medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, or (iii) death;

Payments on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an individual performing services for him after the expiration of six (6) calendar months following the last calendar month in which the individual performed services for such employer;

Payments made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an individual performing services for him or his beneficiary (i) from or to a trust described in section 401(a) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code at the time of such payment unless such payment is made to an individual performing services for the trust as remuneration for such services and not as a beneficiary of the trust, or (ii) under or to an annuity plan which, at the time of such payments, is a plan described in section 403(a) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code, under a cafeteria plan within the meaning of section 125 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code;

Payments made by an employer (without deduction from the remuneration of the individual in its employ) of the tax imposed upon an individual in his employ under section 3101 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code; or

Noncash payments for farm work.

Any third party which makes a sickness or accident disability payment, which is not excluded from wages under subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, shall be treated as the employer with respect to such payment of wages for the purposes of this chapter.

§ 72-1329. Waiting week.

“Waiting week” means the first week of a benefit year that meets the criteria for a compensable week in section 72-1312(1) through (4), Idaho Code, but for which no benefits will be paid to the claimant. Every claimant shall have a waiting week each benefit year.

§ 72-1330. Week.

“Week” means a period of seven (7) consecutive days ending at midnight on Saturday.

§ 72-1331. Administration.

The employment security law shall be administered by the director, who shall be appointed by the governor. Any appointments made under this section shall be confirmed by the state senate.

§ 72-1332. Authority and duties of the commission.

The commission is authorized to hear and decide matters appealed to it in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the federal unemployment tax act. In addition to salaries paid from the industrial administration fund each member of the commission shall receive a salary to be paid from the employment security administration fund in an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the salary paid from the industrial administration fund. Prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, the department and the commission shall negotiate an amount to be paid the commission to reimburse it for the cost of personal and nonpersonal services involved in hearing appeals as provided in section 72-1368(6), Idaho Code.